California statutes. Penal Code
Section 27540 does not apply to the loan of an unloaded firearm by a dealer who also operates a target facility that holds a business or regulatory license on the premises of the building designated in the license or whose building designated in the license is on the premises of any club or organization organized for the purposes of practicing shooting at targets upon established ranges, whether public or private, to a person at that target facility or that club or organization, if the firearm is at all times kept within the premises of the target range or on the premises of the club or organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27740.

Section 27540 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm regulated pursuant to any of the following statutes, if the sale, delivery, or transfer of that firearm is conducted in accordance with the applicable provisions of the statute:

(a) Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18710) of Division 5 of Title 2, relating to destructive devices and explosives.

(b) Section 24410, relating to cane guns, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to cane guns.

(c) Section 24510, relating to firearms that are
 not immediately recognizable as firearms, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to firearms that are not immediately recognizable as firearms.

(d) Sections 24610 and 24680, relating to undetectable firearms, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to undetectable firearms.

(e) Section 24710, relating to wallet guns, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to wallet guns.

(f) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 10, relating to assault weapons.

(g) Section 31500, relating to unconventional pistols, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they
 relate to unconventional pistols.

(h) Sections 33215 to 33225, inclusive, relating to short-barreled rifles and short-barreled shotguns, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to short-barreled rifles and short-barreled shotguns.

(i) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 32610) of Division 10, relating to machineguns.

(j) Section 33600, relating to zip guns, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to zip guns.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27745.

(a) Section 27540 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The firearm is unloaded.

(2) The loan is made by a dealer.

(3) The loan is made to a person who possesses a valid entertainment firearms permit issued pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29500) of Division 8.

(4) The firearm is loaned solely for use as a prop in a motion picture, television, video, theatrical, or other entertainment production or event.

(b) The dealer shall retain a photocopy of the entertainment firearms permit as proof of compliance with this requirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27750.

(a) Section 27540 does not apply to the loan of an unloaded firearm to a consultant-evaluator by a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, if the loan does not exceed 45 days from the date of delivery.

(b) At the time of the loan, the consultant-evaluator shall provide the following information, which the dealer shall retain for two years:

(1) A photocopy of a valid, current, government-issued identification to determine the consultant-evaluator’s identity, including, but not limited to, a California driver’s license, identification card, or passport.

(2) A photocopy of the consultant-evaluator’s valid, current certificate of eligibility.

(3) A letter from the person licensed as an importer, manufacturer, or dealer pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code, with whom the consultant-evaluator has a bona fide business relationship. The letter shall detail the bona fide business purposes for which the firearm is being loaned and confirm that the consultant-evaluator is being loaned the firearm as part of a bona fide business relationship.

(4) The signature of the consultant-evaluator on a form indicating the date the firearm is loaned and the last day the firearm may be returned.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Exceptions to the Requirement of Obtaining a Verification Number [27805. - 27835.]

27805.

(a) Section 27555 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The firearm is unloaded.

(2) The loan is made by a dealer.

(3) The loan is made to a person who possesses a valid entertainment firearms permit issued pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29500) of Division 8.

(4) The firearm is loaned solely for use as a prop in a motion picture, television, video, theatrical, or other entertainment production or event.

(b) The dealer shall retain a photocopy of the entertainment firearms permit as proof of compliance with this requirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27810.

(a) Section 27555 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The firearm is unloaded.

(2) The loan is made by a person who is not a dealer but is a federal firearms licensee pursuant to Chapter 44 of Title 18 (commencing with Section 921) of the United States Code.

(3) The loan is made to a person who possesses a valid entertainment firearms permit issued pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29500) of Division 8.

(4) The firearm is loaned
 for use solely as a prop in a motion picture, television, video, theatrical, or other entertainment production or event.

(b) The person loaning the firearm pursuant to this section shall retain a photocopy of the entertainment firearms permit as proof of compliance with this requirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27815.

(a) Section 27555 does not apply to the loan of an unloaded firearm to a consultant-evaluator by a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, if the loan does not exceed 45 days from the date of delivery.

(b) At the time of the loan, the consultant-evaluator shall provide the following information, which the dealer shall retain for two years:

(1) A photocopy of a valid, current, government-issued identification to determine the consultant-evaluator’s identity, including, but not limited to, a California driver’s license, identification card, or passport.

(2) A photocopy of the consultant-evaluator’s valid, current certificate of eligibility.

(3) A letter from the person licensed as an importer, manufacturer, or dealer pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code, with whom the consultant-evaluator has a bona fide business relationship. The letter shall detail the bona fide business purposes for which the firearm is being loaned and confirm that the consultant-evaluator is being loaned the firearm as part of a bona fide business relationship.

(4) The signature of the consultant-evaluator on a form indicating the date the firearm is loaned and the last day the firearm may be returned.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27820.

(a) Section 27555 does not apply to the sale, loan, or transfer of a firearm by or to a person who is licensed as a collector pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto who is not otherwise licensed as a dealer, manufacturer, or importer of firearms licensed to engage in that business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(b) Section 27555 does not apply to the sale, loan, or transfer of a firearm if both of the following conditions apply:

(1) The sale, loan, or transfer is by or to a person who
 is licensed as an importer or manufacturer of ammunition licensed to engage in business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(2) The person selling, loaning, or transferring the firearm or purchasing that firearm, being transferred that firearm, or being loaned that firearm is not also licensed as an importer or manufacturer of firearms who is licensed to engage in business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 738, Sec. 21.   (SB 376)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27825.

Section 27555 does not apply to the delivery of a firearm to a gunsmith for service or repair, or to the return of the firearm to its owner by the gunsmith, or to the delivery of a firearm by a gunsmith to a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code for service or repair and the return of the firearm to the gunsmith.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27830.

Section 27555 does not apply where the transferor and the transferee are the same person or corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27835.

Section 27555 does not apply where the transfer is to or from a person who has a valid entertainment firearms permit and the transfer involves the loan or return of a firearm used solely as a prop in a television, film, or theatrical production.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Exceptions to the Requirement of Using a Dealer for a Private Party Firearms Transaction [27850. - 27970.]

27850.

(a) Section 27545 does not apply to a sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms if both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The sale, delivery, or transfer is to an authorized representative of a city, city and county, county, or state government, or of the federal government, and is for the governmental entity.

(2) The entity is acquiring the weapon as part of an authorized, voluntary program in which the entity is buying or receiving weapons from private individuals.

(b) Any weapons acquired pursuant to this section shall be disposed of pursuant to the
 applicable provisions of Section 34000 or Sections 18000 and 18005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27855.

Section 27545 does not apply to the sale, delivery, loan, or transfer of a firearm made by an authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, city and county, or state, or of the federal government, to any public or private nonprofit historical society, museum, or institutional collection, or the purchase or receipt of that firearm by that public or private nonprofit historical society, museum, or institutional collection, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The entity receiving the firearm is open to the public.

(b) The firearm prior to delivery is deactivated or rendered inoperable.

(c) The firearm is not subject to any of the following:

(1) Sections 18000 and 18005.

(2) Division 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Title 2.

(3) Section 34000.

(4) Sections 34005 and 34010.

(d) The firearm is not prohibited by other provisions of law from being sold, delivered, or transferred to the public at large.

(e) Prior to delivery, the entity receiving the firearm submits a written statement to the law enforcement representative stating that the firearm will not be restored to operating condition, and will either remain with that entity, or if subsequently
 disposed of, will be transferred in accordance with the applicable provisions listed in Section 16575 and, if applicable, with Section 31615.

(f) Within 10 days of the date that the firearm is sold, loaned, delivered, or transferred to that entity, all of the following information shall be reported to the department in a manner prescribed by the department:

(1) The name of the government entity delivering the firearm.

(2) The make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm.

(3) The name of the person authorized by the entity to take possession of the firearm.

(g) In the event of a change in the status of the designated representative, the entity shall
 notify the department of a new representative within 30 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27860.

Section 27545 does not apply to the sale, delivery, loan, or transfer of a firearm made by any person other than a representative of an authorized law enforcement agency to any public or private nonprofit historical society, museum, or institutional collection, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The entity receiving the firearm is open to the public.

(b) The firearm is deactivated or rendered inoperable prior to delivery.

(c) The firearm is not of a type prohibited from being sold, delivered, or transferred to the public.

(d) Prior to
 delivery, the entity receiving the firearm submits a written statement to the person selling, loaning, or transferring the firearm stating that the firearm will not be restored to operating condition, and will either remain with that entity, or if subsequently disposed of, will be transferred in accordance with the applicable provisions listed in Section 16575 and, if applicable, with Section 31615.

(e) If title to a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is being transferred to the public or private nonprofit historical society, museum, or institutional collection, then the designated representative of that entity shall, within 30 days of taking possession of that firearm, forward by prepaid mail or deliver in person to the Department of Justice, a single report signed by both parties to the transaction, which includes all of the following information:

(1) Information identifying the person representing the public or private historical society, museum, or institutional collection.

(2) Information on how title was obtained and from whom.

(3) A description of the firearm in question.

(4) A copy of the written statement referred to in subdivision (d).

(f) The report forms that are to be completed pursuant to this section shall be provided by the Department of Justice.

(g) In the event of a change in the status of the designated representative, the entity shall notify the department of a new representative within 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 38.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27865.

Section 27545 does not apply to sales, deliveries, or transfers of firearms between or to importers and manufacturers of firearms licensed to engage in that business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27875.

(a) Section 27545 does not apply to the transfer of a firearm by gift, bequest, intestate succession, or other means from one individual to another, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The transfer is infrequent, as defined in Section 16730.

(2) The transfer is between members of the same immediate family.

(3) Within 30 days of taking possession of the firearm, the person to whom it is transferred shall submit a report to the Department of Justice, in a manner prescribed by the department, that includes information concerning the individual taking possession of the firearm, how title was obtained and from whom, and a
 description of the firearm in question. The reports that individuals complete pursuant to this subdivision shall be made available to them in a format prescribed by the department.

(4) Until January 1, 2015, the person taking title to the firearm shall first obtain a valid handgun safety certificate if the firearm is a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2015, a valid firearm safety certificate for any firearm, except that in the case of a handgun, a valid unexpired handgun safety certificate may be used.

(5) The person receiving the firearm is 18 years of age or older.

(b) Subdivision (a) of Section 27585 does not apply to a person who imports a firearm into this state, brings a firearm into this state, or transports a firearm into this state if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The person acquires ownership of the firearm from an immediate family member by bequest or intestate succession.

(2) The person has obtained a valid firearm safety certificate, except that in the case of a handgun, a valid unexpired handgun safety certificate may be used.

(3) The receipt of any firearm by the individual by bequest or intestate succession is infrequent, as defined in Section 16730.

(4) The person acquiring ownership of the firearm by bequest or intestate succession is 18 years of age or older.

(5) Within 30 days of that person taking possession of the firearm and importing, bringing, or transporting it into this state, the person shall submit a report to the Department of
 Justice, in a manner prescribed by the department, that includes information concerning the individual taking possession of the firearm, how title was obtained and from whom, and a description of the firearm in question. The reports that individuals complete pursuant to this subdivision shall be made available to them in a format prescribed by the department.

(c) Furnishing a fictitious name or address, knowingly furnishing any incorrect information, or knowingly omitting any information required to be provided for the form described in this section is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(d) The department shall establish a fee for submission of the report described in this section and an additional fee for each additional firearm. This fee shall not exceed the reasonable and actual costs of processing the
 report submitted pursuant to this section. The department may annually review and adjust this fee to fully fund, but not exceed, these costs.

(e) The department may request photographs of the firearm to determine if the firearm is a generally prohibited weapon, assault weapon, or machinegun, or is otherwise prohibited.

(f) Upon receipt of a report submitted pursuant to this section and any required fee, the department shall examine its records, as well as those records that it is authorized to request from the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Section 8104 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and records available to the department in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System, to determine if the purchaser is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 540, Sec. 9.   (AB 3064)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

27880.

Section 27545 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The loan is to a spouse, registered domestic partner, or any of the following relations, whether by consanguinity, adoption, or steprelation:

(1) Parent.

(2) Child.

(3) Sibling.

 (4) Grandparent.

 (5) Grandchild.

(b) The loan is infrequent, as defined in Section 16730.

(c) The loan is for any lawful purpose.

(d) The loan does not exceed 30 days in duration.

(e) Until January 1, 2015, if the firearm is a handgun, the individual being loaned the firearm shall have a valid handgun safety certificate. Commencing January 1, 2015, for any firearm, the individual being loaned the firearm shall have a valid firearm safety certificate, except that in the case of a handgun, an unexpired handgun safety certificate may be used.

(f) If the firearm being loaned is a handgun, the handgun is registered to the person making the loan pursuant to Section 11106.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 41, Sec. 1.   (AB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

27881.

Section 27545 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) If the firearm being loaned is a handgun, the handgun is registered to the person making the loan pursuant to Section 11106.

(b) The loan occurs within the lender’s place of residence or other real property, except for property that is zoned for commercial, retail, or industrial activity.

(c) The individual receiving the firearm is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(d) The individual receiving the firearm is 18 years of age or older.

(e) The firearm does not leave the real property upon which the loan occurs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 840, Sec. 10.   (SB 172)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27882.

(a) Section 27545 does not apply to the transfer of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The firearm is voluntarily and temporarily transferred to another person who is 18 years of age or older for safekeeping to prevent it from being accessed or used to attempt suicide by the transferor or another person that may gain access to it in the transferor’s household.

(2) The transferee does not use the firearm for any purpose and, except when transporting the firearm to the transferee’s residence or when returning it to the transferor, keeps the firearm unloaded and securely
 stored, as defined in Section 25145, in the transferee’s residence.

(3) The duration of the loan is limited to that amount of time reasonably necessary to prevent the harm described in paragraph (1).

(4) The individual receiving the firearm is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(b) (1) If a firearm that has been transferred pursuant to this section cannot be returned to the owner because the owner is prohibited from possessing a firearm, the person in possession of the firearm shall deliver the firearm to a law enforcement agency without delay.

(2) Section 27545 does not
 apply to the transfer of a firearm to a law enforcement agency pursuant to this subdivision. This section does not authorize the possession of a firearm by any person prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to any other law.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 13) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 542, Sec. 14.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

27883.

Section 27545 does not apply to the loan of a firearm provided all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The firearm being loaned is lawfully owned by the person making the loan pursuant to Section 11106.

(b) The firearm being loaned is stored in the receiver’s place of residence or in an enclosed structure on the receiver’s private property, which is not zoned for commercial, retail, or industrial activity.

(c) The firearm at all times stays within the receiver’s place of residence or in an enclosed structure on the receiver’s private property, which is not
 zoned for commercial, retail, or industrial activity.

(d) The individual receiving the firearm is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(e) The individual receiving the firearm is 18 years of age or older.

(f) The firearm is unloaded and securely stored, as defined in Section 25145.

(g) The loan does not exceed 120 days in duration.

(h) The loan is made without consideration.

(i) There is a written document
 in a format prescribed by the Department of Justice that explains the obligations imposed by this section that is signed by both the party loaning the firearm for storage and the person receiving the firearm.

(j) Both parties to the loan have signed copies of the written document required by subdivision (i).

(k) (1) If a firearm that has been transferred pursuant to this section cannot be returned to the owner because the owner is prohibited from possessing a firearm, the person in possession of the firearm shall deliver the firearm to a law enforcement agency without delay.

(2) Section 27545 does not apply to the transfer of a firearm to a law enforcement
 agency pursuant to this subdivision. This section does not authorize the possession of a firearm by any person prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to any other law.

(l) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 15) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 542, Sec. 16.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

27885.

Section 27545 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions exist:

(a) The person loaning the firearm is at all times within the presence of the person being loaned the firearm.

(b) The loan is for a lawful purpose.

(c) The loan does not exceed three days in duration.

(d) The individual receiving the firearm is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(e) The person loaning
 the firearm is 18 years of age or older.

(f) The person being loaned the firearm is 18 years of age or older.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27890.

Section 27545 does not apply to the delivery of a firearm to a gunsmith for service or repair, or to the return of the firearm to its owner by the gunsmith, or to the delivery of a firearm by a gunsmith to a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code for service or repair and the return of the firearm to the gunsmith.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27895.

Section 27545 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The sale, delivery, or transfer is made by a person who resides in this state.

(b) The sale, delivery, or transfer is made to a person who resides outside this state and is licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(c) The sale, delivery, or transfer is in accordance with Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the
 regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27900.

Section 27545 does not apply to the loan of a firearm other than a handgun at an auction, raffle, or similar event conducted by a nonprofit public benefit or mutual benefit corporation organized pursuant to the Corporations Code if all of the following apply:

(a) The firearm at all times remains on the premises where the auction, raffle, or similar event occurs.

(b) The firearm is to be auctioned, raffled, or otherwise sold for the benefit of that nonprofit public benefit or mutual benefit corporation.

(c) The firearm, when sold or otherwise transferred, is delivered to a person licensed pursuant to, and operating in accordance with,
 Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, for sale or other transfer to the person who purchased or otherwise acquired ownership of the firearm.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 738, Sec. 23.   (SB 376)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27905.

Section 27545 does not apply to the transfer of a firearm if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The firearm is not a handgun.

(b) The firearm is donated for an auction, raffle, or similar event described in Section 27900.

(c) The firearm is delivered to the nonprofit corporation immediately preceding, or contemporaneous with, the auction, raffle, or similar event.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 738, Sec. 24.   (SB 376)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27910.

Section 27545 does not apply to the loan of a firearm to a person 18 years of age or older for the purposes of shooting at targets if the loan occurs on the premises of a target facility that holds a business or regulatory license or on the premises of any club or organization organized for the purposes of practicing shooting at targets upon established ranges, whether public or private, if the firearm is at all times kept within the premises of the target range or on the premises of the club or organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27920.

(a) Section 27545 does not apply to a person who takes title or possession of a firearm by operation of law if the person is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm and all of the following conditions are met:

(1) If the person taking title or possession is neither a levying officer as defined in Section 481.140, 511.060, or 680.260 of the Code of Civil Procedure, nor a person who is receiving that firearm pursuant to subdivision (g), (h), (i), (j), (l), or (q) of Section 16990, the person shall, within 30 days of taking possession, submit a report to the Department of Justice, in a manner prescribed by the department, that includes information concerning the individual taking possession of the firearm,
 how title or possession was obtained and from whom, and a description of the firearm in question.

(2) If the person taking title or possession is receiving the firearm pursuant to subdivision (g), (h), (l), or (q) of Section 16990, the person shall do both of the following:

(A) Within 30 days of taking possession, submit a report to the Department of Justice, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, that includes information concerning the individual taking possession of the firearm, how title or possession was obtained and from whom, and a description of the firearm in question.

(B) Prior to taking title or possession of the firearm, the person shall obtain a valid firearm safety certificate, except
 that in the case of a handgun, a valid unexpired handgun safety certificate may be presented.

(3) Where the person receiving title or possession of the firearm is a person described in subdivision (i) of Section 16990, on the date that the person is delivered the firearm, the name and other information concerning the person taking possession of the firearm, how title or possession of the firearm was obtained and from whom, and a description of the firearm by make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that transferred or delivered the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. An agency without access to AFS
 shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(4) Where the person receiving title or possession of the firearm is a person described in subdivision (j) of Section 16990, on the date that the person is delivered the firearm, the name and other information concerning the person taking possession of the firearm, how title or possession of the firearm was obtained and from whom, and a description of the firearm by make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics shall be entered into the AFS via the CLETS by the law enforcement or state agency that transferred or delivered the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. An agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the
 agency is located to input this information via this system. In addition, that law enforcement agency shall not deliver the firearm to the person referred to in this subdivision unless, prior to the delivery of the firearm, the person presents proof to the agency that the person is the holder of a valid firearm safety certificate, except that in the case of a handgun, a valid unexpired handgun safety certificate may be presented.

(b) Subdivision (a) of Section 27585 does not apply to a person who imports a firearm into this state, brings a firearm into this state, or transports a firearm into this state if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The person acquires ownership of the firearm as an executor, personal representative, or administrator of an estate, or as the trustee of a trust that includes a firearm and that was part of a will that created the trust.

(2) If acquisition of the firearm had occurred within this state, the receipt of the firearm by the executor, personal representative, trustee, or administrator would be exempt from the provisions of Section 27545 pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(3) Within 30 days of taking possession of the firearm and importing, bringing, or transporting it into this state, the person shall submit a report to the Department of Justice, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, that includes information concerning the individual taking possession of the firearm, how title was obtained and from whom, and a description of the firearm in question.

(4) If the executor, personal representative, trustee, or
 administrator subsequently acquires ownership of that firearm in an individual capacity, prior to transferring ownership to themselves, they shall obtain a valid firearm safety certificate, except that in the case of a handgun, a valid unexpired handgun safety certificate may be used.

(5) The executor, personal representative, trustee, or administrator is 18 years of age or older.

(c) Subdivision (a) of Section 27585 does not apply to a person who imports a firearm into this state, brings a firearm into this state, or transports a firearm into this state if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The person acquires ownership of the firearm by bequest or intestate succession as a surviving spouse or as the surviving registered domestic partner of the decedent who owned that firearm.

(2) If acquisition of the firearm had occurred within this state, the receipt of the firearm by the surviving spouse or registered domestic partner would be exempt from the provisions of Section 27545 pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) by virtue of subdivision (h) of Section 16990.

(3) Within 30 days of taking possession of the firearm and importing, bringing, or transporting it into this state, the person shall submit a report to the Department of Justice, in a
 form and manner prescribed by the department, that includes information concerning the individual taking possession of the firearm, how title was obtained and from whom, and a description of the firearm in question.

(4) The person has obtained a valid firearm safety certificate, except that in the case of a handgun, a valid unexpired handgun safety certificate may be used.

(d) Subdivision (a) of Section 27585 does not apply to a person who imports a firearm into this state, brings a firearm into this state, or transports a firearm into this state if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The firearm is imported into this country pursuant to provisions of Section 925(a)(4) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(2) The person is not subject to the requirements of Section 27560.

(3) The firearm is not a firearm that is prohibited by any provision listed in Section 16590.

(4) The firearm is not an assault weapon.

(5) The firearm is not a machinegun.

(6) The firearm is not a .50 BMG rifle.

(7) The firearm is not a destructive device.

(8) The person is 18 years of age or older.

(9) Within 30 days of that person taking possession of the firearm and importing, bringing, or transporting it into this state, the person
 shall submit a report to the Department of Justice, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, that includes information concerning the individual taking possession of the firearm, how title was obtained and from whom, and a description of the firearm in question.

(e) The reports that individuals complete pursuant to this section shall be made available to them in a format prescribed by the Department of Justice.

(f) Furnishing a fictitious name or address, knowingly furnishing any incorrect information, or knowingly omitting any information required to be provided for the form described in this section is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(g) The department shall establish a fee for submission of the report described in this section and an additional fee for each additional firearm. This fee shall not exceed the reasonable and actual costs of processing the report submitted pursuant to this section. The department may annually review and adjust this fee to fully fund, but not exceed, these costs.
